da: Integrerede strømforsyningsmuligheder: AC-stikkontakter; USB-porte; Trådløs opladningsplade; Andet
sl-SI: Možnosti integriranega napajanja: Vtičnice AC; Vrata USB; Brezžična polnilna blazinica; Drugo
de: Integrierte Stromversorgungsoptionen: Steckdosen; USB-Anschlüsse; Kabelloses Ladepad; Sonstige
ro-RO: Opțiuni de alimentare integrate: Prize CA; Porturi USB; Suport de încărcare wireless; Altele
nb: Integrerte strømalternativer: Stikkontakter (AC); USB-porter; Trådløs ladeplate; Annet
zh-CN: 集成电源选项: 交流电源插座; USB 端口; 无线充电板; 其他
th: ตัวเลือกพลังงานแบบบูรณาการ: เต้ารับ AC; พอร์ต USB; แท่นชาร์จไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
sv: Integrerade strömalternativ: Vägguttag; USB-portar; Trådlös laddningsplatta; Annat
ko: 통합 전원 옵션: AC 콘센트; USB 포트; 무선 충전 패드; 기타
hr-HR: Integrirane opcije napajanja: AC utičnice; USB priključci; Podloga za bežično punjenje; Ostalo
en: Integrated power options: AC outlets; USB ports; Wireless charging pad; Other
pt-BR: Opções de energia integradas: Tomadas CA; Portas USB; Base de carregamento sem fio; Outras
bg-BG: Интегрирани опции за захранване: AC контакти; USB портове; Подложка за безжично зареждане; Други
vi: Tùy chọn nguồn điện tích hợp: Ổ cắm AC; Cổng USB; Đế sạc không dây; Khác
fr: Options d’alimentation intégrées: Prises de courant alternatif; Ports USB; Tapis de recharge sans fil; Autre
hu: Integrált tápellátási lehetőségek: Hálózati aljzatok (AC); USB-portok; Vezeték nélküli töltőpad; Egyéb
zh-TW: 內建電源選項: 交流電 (AC) 插座; USB 連接埠; 無線充電板; 其他
cs: Integrované možnosti napájení: AC zásuvky; USB porty; Bezdrátová nabíjecí podložka; Jiné
lt-LT: Integruotos maitinimo parinktys: Kintamosios srovės lizdai; USB lizdai; Belaidžio įkrovimo stotelė; Kita
ru: Встроенные варианты питания: Розетки переменного тока; USB-порты; Панель для беспроводной зарядки; Другое
pl: Zintegrowane opcje zasilania: Gniazda sieciowe (AC); Porty USB; Podkładka do ładowania bezprzewodowego; Inne
it: Opzioni di alimentazione integrate: Prese CA; Porte USB; Pad di ricarica wireless; Altro
nl: Geïntegreerde stroom opties: Stopcontacten; USB-poorten; Draadloze oplader; Overig
pt-PT: Opções de alimentação integradas: Tomadas CA; Portas USB; Base de carregamento sem fios; Outro
fi: Integroidut virtavaihtoehdot: Vaihtovirtapistorasiat; USB-portit; Langaton latausalusta; Muu
ja: 統合電源オプション: ACコンセント; USBポート; ワイヤレス充電パッド; その他
sk-SK: Možnosti integrovaného napájania: Zásuvky striedavého prúdu (AC); USB porty; Bezdrôtová nabíjacia podložka; Iné
el: Ενσωματωμένες επιλογές τροφοδοσίας: Πρίζες AC; Θύρες USB; Βάση ασύρματης φόρτισης; Άλλο
es: Opciones de alimentación integradas: Tomas de CA; Puertos USB; Base de carga inalámbrica; Otras
tr: Entegre güç seçenekleri: AC prizleri; USB bağlantı noktaları; Kablosuz şarj pedi; Diğer